Hawaii statutes.
[§339-24] Penalties. Any person who
knowingly violates this part shall be fined not more than $500 for each
separate offense. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.
Any action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this section
shall be considered a civil action. [L 1989, c 312, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next